Illinois, session 104th, SB3717.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Section 9-241 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/9-241)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 9-241)7    Sec. 9-241. Nondiscrimination. 8    (a) No public utility shall, as to rates or other charges, 9services, facilities or in other respect, make or grant any 10preference or advantage to any corporation or person or 11subject any corporation or person to any prejudice or 12disadvantage. No public utility shall establish or maintain 13any unreasonable difference as to rates or other charges, 14services, facilities, or in any other respect, either as 15between localities or as between classes of service.16    (b) An electric utility in a county with a population of 173,000,000 or more shall not establish or maintain any 18unreasonable difference as to rates or other charges, 19services, contractual terms, or facilities for access to or 20the use of its utility infrastructure by another person or for 21any other purpose. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 22the Commission and its staff shall interpret this Section in 23accordance with Article XVI of this Act.   SB3717- 2 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed as limiting 2the authority of the Commission to permit the establishment of 3economic development rates as incentives to economic 4development either in enterprise zones as designated by the 5State of Illinois or in other areas of a utility's service 6area. Such rates should be available to existing businesses 7which demonstrate an increase to existing load as well as new 8businesses which create new load for a utility so as to create 9a more balanced utilization of generating capacity. The 10Commission shall ensure that such rates are established at a 11level which provides a net benefit to customers within a 12public utility's service area.13    (d) On or before January 1, 2023, the Commission shall 14conduct a comprehensive study to assess whether low-income 15discount rates for electric and natural gas residential 16customers are appropriate and the potential design and 17implementation of any such rates. The Commission shall include 18its findings, together with the appropriate recommendations, 19in a report to be provided to the General Assembly. Upon 20completion of the study, the Commission shall have the 21authority to permit or require electric and natural gas 22utilities to file a tariff establishing low-income discount 23rates.24    Such study shall assess, at a minimum, the following:25        (1) customer eligibility requirements, including 26    income-based eligibility and eligibility based on   SB3717- 3 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1    participation in or eligibility for certain public 2    assistance programs;3        (2) appropriate rate structures, including 4    consideration of tiered discounts for different income 5    levels;6        (3) appropriate recovery mechanisms, including the 7    consideration of volumetric charges and customer charges;8        (4) appropriate verification mechanisms;9        (5) measures to ensure customer confidentiality and 10    data safeguards;11        (6) outreach and consumer education procedures; and12        (7) the impact that a low-income discount rate would 13    have on the affordability of delivery service to 14    low-income customers and customers overall.15    (d-5) For the purposes of this subsection (d-5), 16"qualifying customer" means a residential customer (i) who has 17been deemed eligible for assistance under the Low-Income Home 18Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) or (ii) whose household 19income does not exceed 300% of the federal poverty level.20    Notwithstanding the contents of the report required under 21subsection (d) and any other provision of this Act, the 22Commission may approve a low-income discount rate for electric 23and natural gas residential customers that applies to the 24entirety of a qualifying customer's bill, including, but not 25limited to, a qualifying customer's delivery service charges 26and energy supply charges. An electric or natural gas utility   SB3717- 4 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1may fund low-income discount rates under this subsection (d-5) 2through a surcharge on customers' electric and natural gas 3bills.4    Consistent with the original intent of the changes made to 5this Section by Public Act 102-662, it is the intent of the 6General Assembly that this subsection (d-5) applies 7retroactively to any discount rate approved by the Commission 8on or after January 1, 2023. 9    (e) The Commission shall adopt rules requiring utility 10companies to produce information, in the form of a mailing, 11and other approved methods of distribution, to its consumers, 12to inform the consumers of available rebates, discounts, 13credits, and other cost-saving mechanisms that can help them 14lower their monthly utility bills, and send out such 15information semi-annually, unless otherwise provided by this 16Article. 17    (f) Prior to October 1, 1989, no public utility providing 18electrical or gas service shall consider the use of solar or 19other nonconventional renewable sources of energy by a 20customer as a basis for establishing higher rates or charges 21for any service or commodity sold to such customer; nor shall a 22public utility subject any customer utilizing such energy 23source or sources to any other prejudice or disadvantage on 24account of such use. No public utility shall without the 25consent of the Commission, charge or receive any greater 26compensation in the aggregate for a lesser commodity, product,   SB3717- 5 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1or service than for a greater commodity, product or service of 2like character.3    The Commission, in order to expedite the determination of 4rate questions, or to avoid unnecessary and unreasonable 5expense, or to avoid unjust or unreasonable discrimination 6between classes of customers, or, whenever in the judgment of 7the Commission public interest so requires, may, for rate 8making and accounting purposes, or either of them, consider 9one or more municipalities either with or without the adjacent 10or intervening rural territory as a regional unit where the 11same public utility serves such region under substantially 12similar conditions, and may within such region prescribe 13uniform rates for consumers or patrons of the same class.14    Any public utility, with the consent and approval of the 15Commission, may as a basis for the determination of the 16charges made by it classify its service according to the 17amount used, the time when used, the purpose for which used, 18and other relevant factors.19(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 103-679, eff. 7-19-24.) 20    Section 10. The Energy Assistance Act is amended by 21changing Sections 6 and 13 as follows: 22    (305 ILCS 20/6)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 1406)23    Sec. 6. Eligibility, conditions of participation, and 24energy assistance.   SB3717- 6 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1    (a) Any person who is a resident of the State of Illinois 2and whose household income is not greater than an amount 3determined annually by the Department, in consultation with 4the Policy Advisory Council, may apply for assistance pursuant 5to this Act in accordance with regulations promulgated by the 6Department. In setting the annual eligibility level, the 7Department shall consider the amount of available funding and 8may not set a limit higher than 150% of the federal nonfarm 9poverty level as established by the federal Office of 10Management and Budget or 60% of the State median income for the 11current State fiscal year as established by the U.S. 12Department of Health and Human Services; except that, in 13setting the annual eligibility level for the use of State 14funds from the Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund 15authorized under Section 13, the Department may not set a 16limit higher than 300% for the period from the effective date 17of this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly through 18June 30, 2021, the Department may establish limits not higher 19than 200% of that poverty level. The Department, in 20consultation with the Policy Advisory Council, may adjust the 21percentage of poverty level annually in accordance with 22federal guidelines and based on funding availability. 23    (b) Applicants who qualify for assistance pursuant to 24subsection (a) of this Section shall, subject to appropriation 25from the General Assembly and subject to availability of funds 26to the Department, receive energy assistance as provided by   SB3717- 7 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1this Act. The Department, upon receipt of monies authorized 2pursuant to this Act for energy assistance, shall commit funds 3for each qualified applicant in an amount determined by the 4Department. In determining the amounts of assistance to be 5provided to or on behalf of a qualified applicant, the 6Department shall ensure that the highest amounts of assistance 7go to households with the greatest energy costs in relation to 8household income. The Department shall include factors such as 9energy costs, household size, household income, and region of 10the State when determining individual household benefits. In 11setting assistance levels, the Department shall attempt to 12provide assistance to approximately the same number of 13households who participated in the 1991 Residential Energy 14Assistance Partnership Program. Such assistance levels shall 15be adjusted annually on the basis of funding availability and 16energy costs. In promulgating rules for the administration of 17this Section the Department shall assure that a minimum of 1/3 18of funds available for benefits to eligible households with 19the lowest incomes and that elderly households, households 20with children under the age of 6 years old, and households with 21persons with disabilities are offered a priority application 22period.23    (c) If the applicant is not a customer of record of an 24energy provider for energy services or an applicant for such 25service, such applicant shall receive a direct energy 26assistance payment in an amount established by the Department   SB3717- 8 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1for all such applicants under this Act; provided, however, 2that such an applicant must have rental expenses for housing 3greater than 30% of household income.4    (c-1) This subsection shall apply only in cases where: (1) 5the applicant is not a customer of record of an energy provider 6because energy services are provided by the owner of the unit 7as a portion of the rent; (2) the applicant resides in housing 8subsidized or developed with funds provided under the Rental 9Housing Support Program Act or under a similar locally funded 10rent subsidy program, or is the voucher holder who resides in a 11rental unit within the State of Illinois and whose monthly 12rent is subsidized by the tenant-based Housing Choice Voucher 13Program under Section 8 of the U.S. Housing Act of 1937; and 14(3) the rental expenses for housing are no more than 30% of 15household income. In such cases, the household may apply for 16an energy assistance payment under this Act and the owner of 17the housing unit shall cooperate with the applicant by 18providing documentation of the energy costs for that unit. Any 19compensation paid to the energy provider who supplied energy 20services to the household shall be paid on behalf of the owner 21of the housing unit providing energy services to the 22household. The Department shall report annually to the General 23Assembly on the number of households receiving energy 24assistance under this subsection and the cost of such 25assistance. 26    (d) If the applicant is a customer of an energy provider,   SB3717- 9 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1such applicant shall receive energy assistance in an amount 2established by the Department for all such applicants under 3this Act, such amount to be paid by the Department to the 4energy provider supplying winter energy service to such 5applicant. Such applicant shall:6        (i) make all reasonable efforts to apply to any other 7    appropriate source of public energy assistance; and8        (ii) sign a waiver permitting the Department to 9    receive income information from any public or private 10    agency providing income or energy assistance and from any 11    employer, whether public or private.12    (e) Any qualified applicant pursuant to this Section may 13receive or have paid on such applicant's behalf an emergency 14assistance payment to enable such applicant to obtain access 15to winter energy services. Any such payments shall be made in 16accordance with regulations of the Department.17    (f) The Department may, if sufficient funds are available, 18provide additional benefits to certain qualified applicants:19        (i) for the reduction of past due amounts owed to 20    energy providers; 21        (ii) to assist the household in responding to 22    excessively high summer temperatures or energy costs. 23    Households containing elderly members, children, a person 24    with a disability, or a person with a medical need for 25    conditioned air shall receive priority for receipt of such 26    benefits; and  SB3717- 10 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1        (iii) for the installation of energy conservation 2    measures, health and safety measures, healthy home 3    measures, home improvement measures to help alleviate 4    deferrals from weatherization activities, and renewable 5    energy retrofits. 6(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-176, eff. 6-1-22; 7102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-663, eff. 1-1-25.) 8    (305 ILCS 20/13)9    Sec. 13. Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund. 10    (a) The Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund is 11hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury. The 12Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund is authorized 13to receive moneys from voluntary donations from individuals, 14foundations, corporations, and other sources, moneys received 15pursuant to Section 17, and, by statutory deposit, the moneys 16collected pursuant to this Section. The Fund is also 17authorized to receive voluntary donations from individuals, 18foundations, corporations, and other sources. Subject to 19appropriation, the Department shall use moneys from the 20Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund for: (i) 21payments to electric or gas public utilities, municipal 22electric or gas utilities, and electric cooperatives on behalf 23of their customers who are participants in the program 24authorized by Sections 4 and 18 of this Act; (ii) the provision 25of weatherization services, including, but not limited to, the   SB3717- 11 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1installation of energy conservation measures, health and 2safety measures, healthy home measures, home improvement 3measures to alleviate the deferrals of certain projects, 4including, but not limited to, roofs and foundation repairs, 5and renewable energy retrofits; and (iii) administration of 6the Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund. All other 7deposits outside of the Energy Assistance Charge as set forth 8in subsection (b) are not subject to the percentage 9restrictions related to administrative and weatherization 10expenses provided in this subsection. The yearly expenditures 11for weatherization may not exceed 10% of the amount collected 12during the year pursuant to this Section, except when unspent 13funds from the Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund 14are reallocated from a previous year; any unspent balance of 15the 10% weatherization allowance may be utilized for 16weatherization expenses in the year they are reallocated. The 17yearly administrative expenses of the Supplemental Low-Income 18Energy Assistance Fund may not exceed 15% 13% of the amount 19collected during that year pursuant to this Section, except 20when unspent funds from the Supplemental Low-Income Energy 21Assistance Fund are reallocated from a previous year; any 22unspent balance of the 15% 13% administrative allowance may be 23utilized for administrative expenses in the year they are 24reallocated. Of the 15% 13% administrative allowance, no less 25than 9% 8% shall be provided to Local Administrative Agencies 26for administrative expenses.   SB3717- 12 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1    (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 16-111 of 2the Public Utilities Act but subject to subsection (k) of this 3Section, each public utility, electric cooperative, as defined 4in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, and municipal 5utility, as referenced in Section 3-105 of the Public 6Utilities Act, that is engaged in the delivery of electricity 7or the distribution of natural gas within the State of 8Illinois shall, effective January 1, 2021, assess each of its 9customer accounts a monthly Energy Assistance Charge for the 10Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund. The delivering 11public utility, municipal electric or gas utility, or electric 12or gas cooperative for a self-assessing purchaser remains 13subject to the collection of the fee imposed by this Section. 14The monthly charge shall be as follows:15        (1) Base Energy Assistance Charge per month on each 16    account for residential electrical service; 17        (2) Base Energy Assistance Charge per month on each 18    account for residential gas service; 19        (3) Ten times the Base Energy Assistance Charge per 20    month on each account for non-residential electric service 21    which had less than 10 megawatts of peak demand during the 22    previous calendar year; 23        (4) Ten times the Base Energy Assistance Charge per 24    month on each account for non-residential gas service 25    which had distributed to it less than 4,000,000 therms of 26    gas during the previous calendar year;   SB3717- 13 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1        (5) Three hundred and seventy-five times the Base 2    Energy Assistance Charge per month on each account for 3    non-residential electric service which had 10 megawatts or 4    greater of peak demand during the previous calendar year; 5    and 6        (6) Three hundred and seventy-five times the Base 7    Energy Assistance Charge per month on each account for 8    non-residential gas service which had 4,000,000 or more 9    therms of gas distributed to it during the previous 10    calendar year. 11    Beginning January 1, 2027, the Base Energy Assistance 12Charge shall be $0.80 per month for each utility that is 13required by the Commission to implement a low-income discount 14rate pursuant to Section 9-241 and shall be $0.40 per month for 15each utility that is not required to implement a low-income 16discount rate and that contributes to the Supplemental 17Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund. 18    The Base Energy Assistance Charge shall be $0.48 per month 19for the calendar year beginning January 1, 2022 and shall 20increase by $0.16 per month for any calendar year, provided no 21less than 80% of the previous State fiscal year's available 22Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund funding was 23exhausted. The maximum Base Energy Assistance Charge shall not 24exceed $0.96 per month for any calendar year. 25    The incremental change to such charges imposed by Public 26Act 99-933 and this amendatory Act of the 104th General   SB3717- 14 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1Assembly this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly 2shall not (i) be used for any purpose other than to directly 3assist customers and (ii) be applicable to utilities serving 4less than 100,000 customers in Illinois on January 1, 2021. 5The incremental change to such charges imposed by this 6amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly are intended to 7increase utilization of the Percentage of Income Payment Plan 8(PIPP or PIP Plan) and shall be applied such that PIP Plan 9enrollment is at least doubled, as compared to 2020 10enrollment, by 2024. 11    In addition, electric and gas utilities have committed, 12and shall contribute, a one-time payment of $22 million to the 13Fund, within 10 days after the effective date of the tariffs 14established pursuant to Sections 16-111.8 and 19-145 of the 15Public Utilities Act to be used for the Department's cost of 16implementing the programs described in Section 18 of this 17amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, the Arrearage 18Reduction Program described in Section 18, and the programs 19described in Section 8-105 of the Public Utilities Act. If a 20utility elects not to file a rider within 90 days after the 21effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General 22Assembly, then the contribution from such utility shall be 23made no later than February 1, 2010. 24    (c) For purposes of this Section:25        (1) "residential electric service" means electric 26    utility service for household purposes delivered to a   SB3717- 15 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1    dwelling of 2 or fewer units which is billed under a 2    residential rate, or electric utility service for 3    household purposes delivered to a dwelling unit or units 4    which is billed under a residential rate and is registered 5    by a separate meter for each dwelling unit;6        (2) "residential gas service" means gas utility 7    service for household purposes distributed to a dwelling 8    of 2 or fewer units which is billed under a residential 9    rate, or gas utility service for household purposes 10    distributed to a dwelling unit or units which is billed 11    under a residential rate and is registered by a separate 12    meter for each dwelling unit;13        (3) "non-residential electric service" means electric 14    utility service which is not residential electric service; 15    and16        (4) "non-residential gas service" means gas utility 17    service which is not residential gas service.18    (d) Within 30 days after the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, each public 20utility engaged in the delivery of electricity or the 21distribution of natural gas shall file with the Illinois 22Commerce Commission tariffs incorporating the Energy 23Assistance Charge in other charges stated in such tariffs, 24which shall become effective no later than the beginning of 25the first billing cycle following such filing.26    (e) The Energy Assistance Charge assessed by electric and   SB3717- 16 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1gas public utilities shall be considered a charge for public 2utility service.3    (f) By the 20th day of the month following the month in 4which the charges imposed by the Section were collected, each 5public utility, municipal utility, and electric cooperative 6shall remit to the Department of Revenue all moneys received 7as payment of the Energy Assistance Charge on a return 8prescribed and furnished by the Department of Revenue showing 9such information as the Department of Revenue may reasonably 10require; provided, however, that a utility offering an 11Arrearage Reduction Program or Supplemental Arrearage 12Reduction Program pursuant to Section 18 of this Act shall be 13entitled to net those amounts necessary to fund and recover 14the costs of such Programs as authorized by that Section that 15is no more than the incremental change in such Energy 16Assistance Charge authorized by Public Act 96-33. If a 17customer makes a partial payment, a public utility, municipal 18utility, or electric cooperative may elect either: (i) to 19apply such partial payments first to amounts owed to the 20utility or cooperative for its services and then to payment 21for the Energy Assistance Charge or (ii) to apply such partial 22payments on a pro-rata basis between amounts owed to the 23utility or cooperative for its services and to payment for the 24Energy Assistance Charge.25    If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds the 26distributor's liabilities under this Act, as shown on an   SB3717- 17 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1original return, the Department may authorize the distributor 2to credit such excess payment against liability subsequently 3to be remitted to the Department under this Act, in accordance 4with reasonable rules adopted by the Department. If the 5Department subsequently determines that all or any part of the 6credit taken was not actually due to the distributor, the 7distributor's discount shall be reduced by an amount equal to 8the difference between the discount as applied to the credit 9taken and that actually due, and that distributor shall be 10liable for penalties and interest on such difference. 11    (g) The Department of Revenue shall deposit into the 12Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund all moneys 13remitted to it in accordance with subsection (f) of this 14Section. The utilities shall coordinate with the Department to 15establish an equitable and practical methodology for 16implementing this subsection (g) beginning with the 2010 17program year.18    (h) On or before December 31, 2002, the Department shall 19prepare a report for the General Assembly on the expenditure 20of funds appropriated from the Low-Income Energy Assistance 21Block Grant Fund for the program authorized under Section 4 of 22this Act.23    (i) The Department of Revenue may establish such rules as 24it deems necessary to implement this Section.25    (j) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 26may establish such rules as it deems necessary to implement   SB3717- 18 -LRB104 17298 AAS 30720 b1this Section.2    (k) The charges imposed by this Section shall only apply 3to customers of municipal electric or gas utilities and 4electric or gas cooperatives if the municipal electric or gas 5utility or electric or gas cooperative makes an affirmative 6decision to impose the charge. If a municipal electric or gas 7utility or an electric cooperative makes an affirmative 8decision to impose the charge provided by this Section, the 9municipal electric or gas utility or electric cooperative 10shall inform the Department of Revenue in writing of such 11decision when it begins to impose the charge. If a municipal 12electric or gas utility or electric or gas cooperative does 13not assess this charge, the Department may not use funds from 14the Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund to provide 15benefits to its customers under the program authorized by 16Section 4 of this Act.17    In its use of federal funds under this Act, the Department 18may not cause a disproportionate share of those federal funds 19to benefit customers of systems which do not assess the charge 20provided by this Section.21(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-176, eff. 6-1-22; 22102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 102-673, eff. 11-30-21; 102-699, eff. 234-19-22; 103-820, eff. 8-9-24.)